West Virginia, session 2026, SB459.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 9. ALLOCATION OF CUSTODIAL RESPONSIBILITY AND DECISION-MAKING RESPONSIBILITY OF CHILDREN. §48-9-102. Objectives; best interests of the child. (a) The primary objective of this article is to serve the child’s best interests, by facilitating:(1) Stability of the child;(2) Parental planning and agreement about the child’s custodial arrangements and upbringing;(3) Continuity of existing parent-child attachments;(4) Meaningful contact between a child and each parent;(5) Caretaking and parenting relationships by adults who love the child, know how to provide for the child’s needs, and who place a high priority on doing so;(6) Security from exposure to physical or emotional harm; (7) Expeditious, predictable decisionmaking, and avoidance of prolonged uncertainty respecting arrangements for the child’s care and control; and(8) Meaningful contact between a child and his or her siblings, including half-siblings and step-siblings when the child has an established bond with the step-sibling and the step-sibling lives at least part-time with the biological parent.(b) A secondary objective of this article is to achieve fairness between the parents. The Clerk of the Senate and the Clerk of the House of Delegates hereby certify that the foregoing bill is correctly enrolled.  ............................................................... Clerk of the Senate  		............................................................... Clerk of the House of Delegates				                  Originated in the Senate. In effect 90 days from passage.    				............................................................... President of the Senate  						............................................................... Speaker of the House of Delegates  __________   	The within is ................................................ this the........................................... Day of ..........................................................................................................., 2026.  				.............................................................								Governor Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home